Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3431
Attempted suicide; how construed.

For purposes of making health care decisions, an attempted suicide by the principal shall not be construed as any indication of the principal's wishes with regard to health care.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 31.